Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-507
Levy increase; indicate on budget statement.

When a levy increase has been authorized by vote of the electors, the adopted budget statement shall indicate the amount of the levy increase.

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 6, p. 672;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-926.